Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 43. Joint Commission on Transportation Accountability.

§ 30-282.
Joint Commission on Transportation Accountability established; composition; terms; compensation and expenses; quorum; voting on recommendations.

There is hereby established in the legislative branch of state government the Joint Commission on Transportation Accountability. The Commission shall consist of six members of the House of Delegates appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates, of whom at least three shall be members of the House Committee on Transportation; four members of the Senate appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules of whom at least two shall be members of the Senate Committee on Transportation; and the Auditor of Public Accounts, who shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member. Members shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office as members of the House of Delegates and the Senate. Members may be reappointed for successive terms.

Members of the Commission shall receive such compensation as provided in § 30-19.12 and shall be reimbursed for all their reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the Commission. Funding for the costs of compensation and expenses of the members shall be provided from existing appropriations to the Commission.

The Commission shall annually elect a chairman and a vice-chairman from among its membership. Meetings of the Commission shall be held upon the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request. A majority of the members appointed to the Commission shall constitute a quorum.

History.

2007, c. 896; 2013, c. 332.

The number of this article and §§ 30-282 through 30-286, were

assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the numbers in the 2007 act having been Chapter 42, §§ 30-278 through 30-282.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 126, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. Unsolicited proposals to add capacity to the Hampton Roads Bridge-Tunnel to be accepted for review by the Virginia Department of Transportation; procedure.

“A. The Virginia Department of Transportation is hereby directed to accept for review unsolicited proposals under the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (§ 56-556 et seq. of the Code of Virginia) to add physical capacity to the Interstate 64 Hampton Roads Bridge-Tunnel between Hampton and Norfolk. Unsolicited proposals shall be filed with the Department no later than September 30, 2010.

“B. Upon enactment of this act, the Department shall make available on its website the following: (i) any and all information about the existing Hampton Roads Bridge-Tunnel, including traffic counts, maintenance records, and current plans and specifications and (ii) any and all information, studies, and reports analyzing potential scenarios for the physical expansion of the Hampton Roads Bridge-Tunnel. The Department may take such measures as necessary to protect confidential information or to protect vital state and national security interests that may be contained in such information.

“C. Unsolicited proposals filed pursuant to this act shall provide information regarding team qualifications and experience, project structure, a schedule for project development, the proposed cost and outline public benefits of the project. The Department shall develop a process that would permit a private entity that is part of a proposal team to assist with the development of state or federally mandated environmental reviews or permits required to complete the project. Completion of such reviews or permits shall not be necessary prior to a decision by the Department to advance consideration of conceptual proposals.

“D. Within 30 days of the receipt of unsolicited proposals, the Department shall post a public notice of the unsolicited proposals and provide 120 days for any competing proposals. Following an internal analysis of the proposals to determine the financial and technical merit of the proposals and the proposal teams, the Department shall make a recommendation no later than May 1, 2011, to the Commonwealth Transportation Board whether to advance no more than two proposals to an Independent Review Panel. The Panel, which shall be appointed by the Secretary of Transportation, shall afford opportunities for public comment on the proposals and provide additional review and analysis of the remaining proposals.

“E. No later than September 1, 2011, the Department shall make a recommendation to the Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner [now Commissioner of Highways] whether to execute an interim agreement to continue design, environmental reviews, and preliminary right-of-way acquisitions and to take any other steps necessary to advance the development of the project. Moneys in the Transportation Partnership Opportunity Fund may be made available to carry out the provisions of the interim agreement. The interim agreement shall also provide a schedule for the completion of the necessary reviews and approvals for construction of the project.”

Acts 2010, c. 126, cl. 2 provides: “The Virginia Department of Transportation shall promptly inform the Joint Commission on Transportation Accountability, as authorized by Chapter 43 (§ 30-282 et seq.) of Title 30 of the Code of Virginia, by written update, of its completion of each requirement of this act.”

Acts 2011, cc. 568 and 633 cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. Unsolicited proposals for development and operations of the Patriots Crossing (Third Crossing) project to be accepted for review by the Virginia Department of Transportation; procedure.

“A. The Virginia Department of Transportation is hereby directed to accept for review unsolicited proposals under the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (§ 56-556 et seq. of the Code of Virginia) for the development and operations of the Patriots Crossing (Third Crossing) project at Hampton Roads. Unsolicited proposals shall be filed with the Department no later than September 30, 2011.

“B. Upon enactment of this act, the Department shall make available on its website any and all information about the proposed Patriots Crossing (Third Crossing) project. The Department may take such measures as necessary to protect confidential or proprietary information or to protect vital state and national security interests that may be contained in such information.

“C. Unsolicited proposals filed pursuant to this act shall provide information regarding team qualifications and experience, the proposed scope of work for the project, a schedule for project development, the proposed cost (including design, construction, operations, and maintenance costs), a conceptual finance plan (which includes the sources and uses of funds), and a discussion of public benefits of the project. The Department shall develop a process that would permit a private entity that is part of a proposal team to assist with the development of state or federally mandated environmental reviews or permits required to complete the project. Completion of such reviews or permits shall not be necessary prior to a decision by the Department to advance consideration of conceptual proposals.

“D. Unsolicited proposals filed pursuant to this act shall provide information regarding team qualifications and experience, the proposed scope of work for the project, a schedule for project development, the proposed cost (including design, construction, operations, and maintenance costs), a conceptual finance plan (which includes the sources and uses of funds), and a discussion of public benefits of the project. The Department shall develop a process that would permit a private entity that is part of a proposal team to assist with the development of state or federally mandated environmental reviews or permits required to complete the project. Completion of such reviews or permits shall not be necessary prior to a decision by the Department to advance consideration of conceptual proposals.

“E. No later than September 1, 2012, the steering committee shall make a recommendation to the Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner [Commissioner of Highways] whether to advance development of the Patriots Crossing (Third Crossing) project by entering into an interim or comprehensive agreement with one or more of the proposal teams or by issuing a request for detailed proposals to one or more of the proposal teams pursuant to the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (§ 56-556 et seq. of the Code of Virginia) and the guidelines developed in accordance with subsection D of § 56-560 of the Code of Virginia. Moneys in the Transportation Partnership Opportunity Fund may be made available to carry out the provisions of an interim or comprehensive agreement. The interim or comprehensive agreement shall also provide a schedule for the completion of the necessary reviews and approvals for construction of the Patriots Crossing (Third Crossing) project.”

Acts 2011, cc. 568 and 633, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Department of Transportation shall promptly inform the Joint Commission on Transportation Accountability, as authorized by Chapter 43 (§ 30-282 et seq.) of Title 30 of the Code of Virginia, by written update, of its completion of each requirement of this act.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 332 deleted “Adequate office space shall be provided by the Commonwealth” at the end of the second paragraph.

§ 30-283.
Staff.

Administrative staff support shall be provided by the Office of the Clerk of the house of the General Assembly of which the Chairman of the Commission is a member. Legal, research, policy analysis, and other services as requested by the Commission shall be provided by the Division of Legislative Services. Technical assistance shall be provided by the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission upon request.

History.

2007, c. 896; 2012, c. 329.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 329 rewrote the section.

§ 30-284.
Powers and duties of Commission.

The Commission shall have the following powers and duties:

To make performance reviews of operations of state agencies with transportation responsibilities to ascertain that sums appropriated have been or are being expended for the purposes for which they were made and to evaluate the effectiveness of programs in accomplishing legislative intent;

To study, on a continuing basis, the operations, practices, and duties of state agencies with transportation responsibilities as they relate to efficiency in the use of space, personnel, equipment, and facilities;

To retain such consultants and advisers as the Commission deems necessary to evaluate financial and project management of state agencies with transportation responsibilities;

To make such special studies of and reports on the operations and functions of state agencies with transportation responsibilities as it deems appropriate and as may be requested by the General Assembly;

To review actions of the Commonwealth Transportation Board; and

To make recommendations to the General Assembly on necessary transportation legislation.

History.

2007, c. 896; 2015, c. 480.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 480 added subdivisions 5 and 6; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 30-285.
State agencies to furnish information and assistance.

All agencies of the Commonwealth, their staff, and employees shall provide the Commission with necessary information for the performance of its duties and afford the Commission’s staff ample opportunity to observe agency operations.

History.

2007, c. 896.

§ 30-286.
Payment of expenses of Commission.

The salaries, per diems, and other expenses necessary to the function of the Commission shall be payable from funds appropriated to the Commission.

History.

2007, c. 896.